Vermont, session 2025-2026, H835.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 1075 is amended to read:
§ 1075. LEGAL RESIDENCE DEFINED; RESPONSIBILITY AND
PAYMENT OF EDUCATION OF STUDENT
* * *
(c) State-placed students.
(1) A State-placed student in the legal custody of the Commissioner for
Children and Families, other than one placed in a 24-hour residential facility
and except as otherwise provided in this subsection, shall be educated by the
student’s school of origin, unless the student’s education team determines that
it is not in the student’s best interests to attend the school of origin. The
student’s education team shall include, as applicable, the student, the student’s
parents and foster parents, the student’s guardian ad litem and educational
surrogate parent, representatives of both the school of origin and potential new
school, and a representative of the Family Services Division of the Department
for Children and Families. In the case of a dispute about whether it is in the
student’s best interests to attend the school of origin, the Commissioner for
Children and Families shall make the final decision. As used in this section,
“school of origin” means the school in which the child was enrolled at the time
of placement into custody of the Commissioner for Children and Families, or
VT LEG #386187 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.835
2026 Page 3 of 8
in the case of a student already in the custody of the Commissioner for
Children and Families, the school the student most recently attended.
* * *
(e)(1) For the purposes of this title, the legal residence or residence of a
child of homeless parents is the child’s school of origin, as defined in
subdivision (c)(1) of this section, unless the parents and another school district
agree that the child’s attendance in school in that school district will be in the
best interests of the child. A “child of homeless parents” means a child whose
parents:
(1)(A) lack a fixed, regular, and adequate residence; or
(2)(B) have a primary nighttime residence in a supervised publicly or
privately operated shelter for temporary accommodations such as public
assistance hotels, emergency shelters, battered women’s shelters, and
transitional housing facilities, or a public or private place not designated for, or
ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings.
(2) If the parents and a school district other than the child’s school
district of origin agree that the child’s attendance in school in that school
district will be in the best interests of the child, the school district shall
immediately enroll the child and contact the school last attended by the child to
obtain any records necessary for enrollment.
VT LEG #386187 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.835
2026 Page 4 of 8
(3) If the child continues attendance at the child’s school of origin and
the child’s parent or legal guardian seeks shelter or is located in another school
district, the school district of the school of origin shall provide transportation
assistance to ensure the child can regularly attend school.
(4) The board of each school district shall designate one or more of the
employees of the school district to act as a homeless education liaison. The
homeless education liaison shall facilitate a homeless child’s access to and
success in school. The homeless education liaison shall also assist in the
mediation of any disputes concerning school enrollment, in making
arrangements for transportation of the homeless child to and from school, and
in requesting school and immunization records, and assist any unaccompanied
homeless child in making enrollment decisions. On or before the average daily
membership census period under subdivision 4001(1) of this title, the homeless
education liaison in each school district shall report the number of homeless
children enrolled in the district to the Agency.
* * *
Sec. 2. EDUCATIONAL STABILITY GRANT PROGRAM;
APPROPRIATION
(a) Grant Program creation. There is created within the Agency of
Education the Educational Stability Grant Program to provide grant money to
public education providers to use in supporting highly mobile students by
VT LEG #386187 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.835
2026 Page 5 of 8
providing academic and social-emotional services and supports with the goals
of improving school attendance and promotion rates, reducing behavioral and
disciplinary incidents, and increasing graduation rates. Subject to available
appropriations, commencing with the 2027 fiscal year, the Agency shall award
educational stability grants to preschool, elementary, and secondary public
education providers from money appropriated to the Agency for the Grant
Program.
(1) The Agency shall adopt polices, procedures, and guidelines
necessary for implementation of the Grant Program. At a minimum, the
policies shall include:
(A) timelines and procedures by which a public education provider
may apply for a grant; and
(B) the information to be included on grant applications, including at
a minimum:
(i) the number of highly mobile students the education provider
served in the previous school year, which shall include children or youth who
at any time during the academic year were homeless, as defined in 16 V.S.A.
§ 1075(e) or were State-placed students under 16 V.S.A. § 1075(c);
(ii) a description of services to be provided through the grant,
including a description of innovative practices to address barriers for students;
VT LEG #386187 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.835
2026 Page 6 of 8
(iii) a description of the need for the services to be provided
through the grant;
(iv) an estimated cost to provide services through the grant;
(v) criteria for measurement of the effectiveness of services
provided through the grant;
(vi) a description of the public education provider’s existing
policies and practices relating to the transfer of student records between
education providers;
(vii) the public education provider’s collaboration with social
service agencies to make best-interest determinations and to provide
transportation, when needed;
(viii) the provision of services for students who receive special
education services;
(ix) access to extracurricular activities for students who receive
special education services;
(x) transition practices relating to school moves for students; and
(xi) engagement in academic supports, such as work-based
learning.
(2) Each public education provider that seeks a grant pursuant to this
section shall submit an application to the Agency in accordance with the
policies, procedures, and guidance issued pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
VT LEG #386187 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.835
2026 Page 7 of 8
subsection. The Agency shall review the grant applications received and
award grants to successful applicants.
(b) Funding.
(1) Appropriation. The sum of $500,000.00 is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Agency of Education in fiscal year 2027 for the purpose of
providing grants to public education providers through the Educational
Stability Grant Program created pursuant to this section.
(2) Other sources. The Agency may seek, accept, and expend gifts,
grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this
section.
(c) Evaluation. Annually on or before July 15, the Agency shall evaluate
the educational stability services provided by each public education provider
that received a grant pursuant to this section in the preceding fiscal year;
provided, however that the Agency need not provide an evaluation for any
fiscal year in which grants were not awarded. At a minimum, the Agency shall
review:
(1) the outcomes and effectiveness of the services provided as measured
by the demonstrated degree of educational stability;
(2) the improvement in school attendance;
(3) the reduction in behavioral and discipline incidents;
VT LEG #386187 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.835
2026 Page 8 of 8
(4) the increase in grade-level promotion;
(5) the reduction in the dropout rate; and
(6) the increase in the graduation and completion rates for the grant
recipients’ schools.
(d) Report. Notwithstanding 2 V.S.A. § 20(d), annually on or before
December 1, the Agency shall submit a written report to the House and Senate
Committees on Education with the results of the evaluation it conducted
pursuant to subsection (c) of this section and any recommendations for
legislative action.
(e) Definitions. As used in this section, “public education provider”
means:
(1) a school district as defined in 16 V.S.A. § 11(10);
(2) a supervisory union as defined in 16 V.S.A. § 11(23);
(3) a program of prekindergarten education prequalified pursuant to 16
V.S.A. § 829 operated by a school district; and
(4) the University of Vermont and the Vermont State Colleges
Corporation.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386187 v.1